nl: Compatibel constructiesetsysteem: Compatibel met BRIO Builder; Compatibel met Connetix; Compatibel met generieke bouwstenen; Compatibel met K'NEX; Compatibel met LEGO DUPLO; Compatibel met LEGO; Compatibel met Lincoln Logs; Compatibel met Magna-Tiles; Compatibel met Mega Construx; Compatibel met Nanoblock; Niet-compatibel / eigen systeem; Compatibel met Playmobil; Compatibel met Plus-Plus; Compatibel met Tinkertoy; Overig
tr: Uyumlu yapı seti sistemi: BRIO Builder uyumlu; Connetix uyumlu; Genel birbirine geçen parçalarla uyumlu; K'NEX uyumlu; LEGO DUPLO uyumlu; LEGO uyumlu; Lincoln Logs uyumlu; Magna-Tiles uyumlu; Mega Construx uyumlu; Nanoblock uyumlu; Uyumlu değil / özel sistem; Playmobil uyumlu; Plus-Plus uyumlu; Tinkertoy uyumlu; Diğer
es: Sistema de construcción compatible: Compatible con BRIO Builder; Compatible con Connetix; Compatible con bloques genéricos; Compatible con K'NEX; Compatible con LEGO DUPLO; Compatible con LEGO; Compatible con Lincoln Logs; Compatible con Magna-Tiles; Compatible con Mega Construx; Compatible con Nanoblock; No compatible / sistema patentado; Compatible con Playmobil; Compatible con Plus-Plus; Compatible con Tinkertoy; Otro
cs: Kompatibilní systém stavebnice: Kompatibilní s BRIO Builder; Kompatibilní s Connetix; Kompatibilní s běžnými spojovacími kostkami; Kompatibilní s K'NEX; Kompatibilní s LEGO DUPLO; Kompatibilní s LEGO; Kompatibilní s Lincoln Logs; Kompatibilní s Magna-Tiles; Kompatibilní s Mega Construx; Kompatibilní s Nanoblock; Nekompatibilní / chráněný systém; Kompatibilní s Playmobil; Kompatibilní s Plus-Plus; Kompatibilní s Tinkertoy; Jiné
ko: 호환 조립식 세트 시스템: BRIO Builder 호환; Connetix 호환; 일반 인터로킹 브릭 호환; K'NEX 호환; LEGO DUPLO 호환; LEGO 호환; Lincoln Logs 호환; Magna-Tiles 호환; Mega Construx 호환; Nanoblock 호환; 호환 안 됨/독점 시스템; Playmobil 호환; Plus-Plus 호환; Tinkertoy 호환; 기타
el: Συμβατό σύστημα σετ κατασκευής: Συμβατό με BRIO Builder; Συμβατό με Connetix; Συμβατό με κοινά τουβλάκια; Συμβατό με K'NEX; Συμβατό με LEGO DUPLO; Συμβατό με LEGO; Συμβατό με Lincoln Logs; Συμβατό με Magna-Tiles; Συμβατό με Mega Construx; Συμβατό με Nanoblock; Μη συμβατό / ιδιόκτητο σύστημα; Συμβατό με Playmobil; Συμβατό με Plus-Plus; Συμβατό με Tinkertoy; Άλλο
pt-PT: Sistema de conjunto de construção compatível: Compatível com BRIO Builder; Compatível com Connetix; Compatível com blocos de encaixe genéricos; Compatível com K'NEX; Compatível com LEGO DUPLO; Compatível com LEGO; Compatível com Lincoln Logs; Compatível com Magna-Tiles; Compatível com Mega Construx; Compatível com Nanoblock; Não compatível/sistema proprietário; Compatível com Playmobil; Compatível com Plus-Plus; Compatível com Tinkertoy; Outro
ja: 互換性のある組み立てセットシステム: BRIO Builder互換; Connetix互換; 一般的なはめ込み式ブロックと互換; K'NEX互換; LEGO DUPLO互換; LEGO互換; Lincoln Logs互換; Magna-Tiles互換; Mega Construx互換; nanoblock互換; 互換性なし / 独自規格; Playmobil互換; Plus-Plus互換; Tinkertoy互換; その他
en: Compatible construction set system: BRIO Builder-compatible; Connetix-compatible; Generic interlocking bricks compatible; K'NEX-compatible; LEGO DUPLO-compatible; LEGO-compatible; Lincoln Logs-compatible; Magna-Tiles-compatible; Mega Construx-compatible; Nanoblock-compatible; Not compatible / proprietary system; Playmobil-compatible; Plus-Plus-compatible; Tinkertoy-compatible; Other
de: Kompatibles Konstruktionsspielsystem: Kompatibel mit BRIO Builder; Kompatibel mit Connetix; Kompatibel mit generischen Klemmbausteinen; Kompatibel mit K'NEX; Kompatibel mit LEGO DUPLO; Kompatibel mit LEGO; Kompatibel mit Lincoln Logs; Kompatibel mit Magna-Tiles; Kompatibel mit Mega Construx; Kompatibel mit Nanoblock; Nicht kompatibel/proprietäres System; Kompatibel mit Playmobil; Kompatibel mit Plus-Plus; Kompatibel mit Tinkertoy; Sonstige
fi: Yhteensopiva rakennussarjajärjestelmä: BRIO Builder -yhteensopiva; Connetix-yhteensopiva; Yhteensopiva yleisten rakennuspalikoiden kanssa; K'NEX-yhteensopiva; LEGO DUPLO -yhteensopiva; LEGO-yhteensopiva; Lincoln Logs -yhteensopiva; Magna-Tiles-yhteensopiva; Mega Construx -yhteensopiva; Nanoblock-yhteensopiva; Ei yhteensopiva / omistusoikeudellinen järjestelmä; Playmobil-yhteensopiva; Plus-Plus-yhteensopiva; Tinkertoy-yhteensopiva; Muu
hu: Kompatibilis építőkészlet-rendszer: BRIO Builder-kompatibilis; Connetix-kompatibilis; Általános egymásba illeszkedő építőkockákkal kompatibilis; K'NEX-kompatibilis; LEGO DUPLO-kompatibilis; LEGO-kompatibilis; Lincoln Logs-kompatibilis; Magna-Tiles-kompatibilis; Mega Construx-kompatibilis; Nanoblock-kompatibilis; Nem kompatibilis / saját rendszer; Playmobil-kompatibilis; Plus-Plus-kompatibilis; Tinkertoy-kompatibilis; Egyéb
sv: Kompatibelt byggsatssystem: Kompatibel med BRIO Builder; Kompatibel med Connetix; Kompatibel med generiska byggklossar; Kompatibel med K'NEX; Kompatibel med LEGO DUPLO; Kompatibel med LEGO; Kompatibel med Lincoln Logs; Kompatibel med Magna-Tiles; Kompatibel med Mega Construx; Kompatibel med Nanoblock; Inte kompatibel/patentskyddat system; Kompatibel med Playmobil; Kompatibel med Plus-Plus; Kompatibel med Tinkertoy; Annat
th: ระบบชุดบล็อกประกอบที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: รองรับ BRIO Builder; รองรับ Connetix; รองรับตัวต่อบล็อกทั่วไป; รองรับ K'NEX; รองรับ LEGO DUPLO; รองรับ LEGO; รองรับ Lincoln Logs; รองรับ Magna-Tiles; รองรับ Mega Construx; รองรับ Nanoblock; ไม่รองรับ/ระบบกรรมสิทธิ์เฉพาะ; รองรับ Playmobil; รองรับ Plus-Plus; รองรับ Tinkertoy; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Suderinama konstravimo rinkinio sistema: Suderinama su „BRIO Builder“; Suderinama su „Connetix“; Suderinama su universaliomis sujungiamomis kaladėlėmis; Suderinama su K'NEX; Suderinama su LEGO DUPLO; Suderinama su LEGO; Suderinama su „Lincoln Logs“; Suderinama su „Magna-Tiles“; Suderinama su „Mega Construx“; Suderinama su „Nanoblock“; Nesuderinama / nuosavybinė sistema; Suderinama su „Playmobil“; Suderinama su „Plus-Plus“; Suderinama su „Tinkertoy“; Kita
it: Sistema di costruzioni compatibile: Compatibile con BRIO Builder; Compatibile con Connetix; Compatibile con mattoncini a incastro generici; Compatibile con K'NEX; Compatibile con LEGO DUPLO; Compatibile con LEGO; Compatibile con Lincoln Logs; Compatibile con Magna-Tiles; Compatibile con Mega Construx; Compatibile con Nanoblock; Non compatibile / sistema proprietario; Compatibile con Playmobil; Compatibile con Plus-Plus; Compatibile con Tinkertoy; Altro
pl: Kompatybilny system klocków konstrukcyjnych: Kompatybilny z BRIO Builder; Kompatybilny z Connetix; Kompatybilny z uniwersalnymi klockami wciskowymi; Kompatybilny z K'NEX; Kompatybilny z LEGO DUPLO; Kompatybilny z LEGO; Kompatybilny z Lincoln Logs; Kompatybilny z Magna-Tiles; Kompatybilny z Mega Construx; Kompatybilny z Nanoblock; Niekompatybilny / system zastrzeżony; Kompatybilny z Playmobil; Kompatybilny z Plus-Plus; Kompatybilny z Tinkertoy; Inne
nb: Kompatibelt byggesettsystem: Kompatibel med BRIO Builder; Kompatibel med Connetix; Kompatibel med generiske byggeklosser; Kompatibel med K'NEX; Kompatibel med LEGO DUPLO; Kompatibel med LEGO; Kompatibel med Lincoln Logs; Kompatibel med Magna-Tiles; Kompatibel med Mega Construx; Kompatibel med Nanoblock; Ikke kompatibel / proprietært system; Kompatibel med Playmobil; Kompatibel med Plus-Plus; Kompatibel med Tinkertoy; Annet
da: Kompatibelt byggesætsystem: Kompatibel med BRIO Builder; Kompatibel med Connetix; Kompatibel med generiske byggeklodser; Kompatibel med K'NEX; Kompatibel med LEGO DUPLO; Kompatibel med LEGO; Kompatibel med Lincoln Logs; Kompatibel med Magna-Tiles; Kompatibel med Mega Construx; Kompatibel med Nanoblock; Ikke kompatibel / navnebeskyttet system; Kompatibel med Playmobil; Kompatibel med Plus-Plus; Kompatibel med Tinkertoy; Andet
pt-BR: Sistema de conjunto de construção compatível: Compatível com BRIO Builder; Compatível com Connetix; Compatível com blocos de montar genéricos; Compatível com K'NEX; Compatível com LEGO DUPLO; Compatível com LEGO; Compatível com Lincoln Logs; Compatível com Magna-Tiles; Compatível com Mega Construx; Compatível com Nanoblock; Não compatível / sistema exclusivo; Compatível com Playmobil; Compatível com Plus-Plus; Compatível com Tinkertoy; Outro
fr: Système de jeu de construction compatible: Compatible avec BRIO Builder; Compatible avec Connetix; Compatible avec briques à emboîtement génériques; Compatible avec K'NEX; Compatible avec LEGO DUPLO; Compatible avec LEGO; Compatible avec Lincoln Logs; Compatible avec Magna-Tiles; Compatible avec Mega Construx; Compatible avec Nanoblock; Non compatible / système propriétaire; Compatible avec Playmobil; Compatible avec Plus-Plus; Compatible avec Tinkertoy; Autre
hr-HR: Kompatibilni sustav konstrukcijskih setova: Kompatibilno sa sustavom BRIO Builder; Kompatibilno sa sustavom Connetix; Kompatibilno s generičkim blokovima za slaganje; Kompatibilno sa sustavom K'NEX; Kompatibilno sa sustavom LEGO DUPLO; Kompatibilno sa sustavom LEGO; Kompatibilno sa sustavom Lincoln Logs; Kompatibilno sa sustavom Magna-Tiles; Kompatibilno sa sustavom Mega Construx; Kompatibilno sa sustavom Nanoblock; Nije kompatibilno / vlasnički sustav; Kompatibilno sa sustavom Playmobil; Kompatibilno sa sustavom Plus-Plus; Kompatibilno sa sustavom Tinkertoy; Ostalo
bg-BG: Съвместима система за конструкторски комплекти: Съвместим с BRIO Builder; Съвместим с Connetix; Съвместим със стандартни тухлички за сглобяване; Съвместим с K'NEX; Съвместим с LEGO DUPLO; Съвместим с LEGO; Съвместим с Lincoln Logs; Съвместим с Magna-Tiles; Съвместим с Mega Construx; Съвместим с Nanoblock; Несъвместим / собствена система; Съвместим с Playmobil; Съвместим с Plus-Plus; Съвместим с Tinkertoy; Друго
ro-RO: Sistem de set de construcție compatibil: Compatibil cu BRIO Builder; Compatibil cu Connetix; Compatibil cu piese generice care se îmbină; Compatibil cu K'NEX; Compatibil cu LEGO DUPLO; Compatibil cu LEGO; Compatibil cu Lincoln Logs; Compatibil cu Magna-Tiles; Compatibil cu Mega Construx; Compatibil cu Nanoblock; Necompatibil / sistem deținut; Compatibil cu Playmobil; Compatibil cu Plus-Plus; Compatibil cu Tinkertoy; Altele
vi: Hệ thống bộ lắp ráp tương thích: Tương thích BRIO Builder; Tương thích Connetix; Tương thích gạch xếp hình chung; Tương thích K'NEX; Tương thích LEGO DUPLO; Tương thích LEGO; Tương thích Lincoln Logs; Tương thích Magna-Tiles; Tương thích Mega Construx; Tương thích Nanoblock; Không tương thích / hệ thống độc quyền; Tương thích Playmobil; Tương thích Plus-Plus; Tương thích Tinkertoy; Khác
zh-CN: 适配的构造套装系统: 兼容 BRIO Builder; 兼容 Connetix; 兼容普通积木块; 兼容 K'NEX; 兼容 LEGO DUPLO; 兼容 LEGO; 兼容 Lincoln Logs; 兼容 Magna-Tiles; 兼容 Mega Construx; 兼容 Nanoblock; 不兼容/专有系统; 兼容 Playmobil; 兼容 Plus-Plus; 兼容 Tinkertoy; 其他
zh-TW: 相容的積木系統: 相容於 BRIO Builder; 相容於 Connetix; 相容於一般積木; 相容於 K'NEX; 相容於 LEGO DUPLO; 相容於 LEGO; 相容於 Lincoln Logs; 相容於 Magna-Tiles; 相容於 Mega Construx; 相容於 Nanoblock; 不相容 / 專有系統; 相容於 Playmobil; 相容於 Plus-Plus; 相容於 Tinkertoy; 其他
ru: Совместимый материал системы охлаждения: Совместимо с BRIO Builder; Совместимо с Connetix; Совместимо со стандартными блочными конструкторами; Совместимо с K'NEX; Совместимо с LEGO DUPLO; Совместимо с LEGO; Совместимо с Lincoln Logs; Совместимо с Magna-Tiles; Совместимо с Mega Construx; Совместимо с Nanoblock; Несовместимо / проприетарная система; Совместимо с Playmobil; Совместимо с Plus-Plus; Совместимо с Tinkertoy; Другое
sl-SI: Združljiv sistem gradbenih kompletov: Združljivo z BRIO Builder; Združljivo s Connetix; Združljivo s splošnimi sestavljivimi kockami; Združljivo s K'NEX; Združljivo z LEGO DUPLO; Združljivo z LEGO; Združljivo z Lincoln Logs; Združljivo z Magna-Tiles; Združljivo z Mega Construx; Združljivo z Nanoblock; Ni združljivo/lastniški sistem; Združljivo s Playmobil; Združljivo s Plus-Plus; Združljivo s Tinkertoy; Drugo
sk-SK: Kompatibilný systém stavebníc: Kompatibilné s BRIO Builder; Kompatibilné s Connetix; Kompatibilné s bežnými zasúvacími kockami; Kompatibilné s K'NEX; Kompatibilné s LEGO DUPLO; Kompatibilné s LEGO; Kompatibilné s Lincoln Logs; Kompatibilné s Magna-Tiles; Kompatibilné s Mega Construx; Kompatibilné s Nanoblock; Nekompatibilné/proprietárny systém; Kompatibilné s Playmobil; Kompatibilné s Plus-Plus; Kompatibilné s Tinkertoy; Iné